Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,196
Director, defined.

Director means the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 146;

Laws 2026, LB759, § 23.
July 18, 2026